Missouri, session 2026, SB1422.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Sections 262.820, 262.826, 262.835, and
262.856, RSMo, and section 311.554 as enacted by house bill no.
1041, one hundred third general assembly, first regular
session, are repealed and five new sections enacted in lieu
thereof, to be known as sections 262.820, 262.826, 262.835,
262.856, and 311.554, to read as follows:
262.820. There is hereby created the "Missouri Wine
[and], Grape, and Spirits Board", a body politic and
corporate, an independent instrumentality exercising
essential public functions, with duties and powers as set
forth in sections 262.820 to 262.859.
262.826. As used in sections 262.820 to 262.859, the
following terms shall mean:
(1) "Board", the Missouri wine [and], grape, and
spirits board established pursuant to section 262.820;
(2) "Council", the Missouri wine marketing and
research council established pursuant to section 275.462;
EXPLANATION-Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in this bill is not enacted
and is intended to be omitted in the law.

SB 1422 2
(3) "Distilled spirits", beverages produced by
distillation from fermented grain, fruit, or other
agricultural products.
262.835. The powers of the board shall be vested in
eleven members, who shall be residents of this state. [The
board shall be composed of seven industry members who shall
represent the Missouri grape and wine industry, food service
industry, or media marketing industry. These seven members
shall be current members of the Missouri grape and wine
advisory board as of the effective date of this act. Such
members shall serve the remainder of their terms established
for the advisory board. Upon the expiration of the terms of
such members, the members of the board representing the
industry shall be appointed by the governor, with the advice
and consent of the senate. Except for ex officio members,]
Each board member shall be appointed by the governor [shall]
with the advice and consent of the senate as follows: five
members shall be from the grape and wine industry, three
members shall be from the distilled spirits industry, one
member shall be a representative of the Missouri division of
tourism, one member shall be a representative of the
Missouri department of agriculture, and one member shall be
a member of the public with expertise in marketing or
economic development. Each member shall serve a four-year
term ending four years from the date of expiration of the
term for which his or her predecessor was appointed; except
that a person appointed to fill a vacancy prior to the
expiration of such a term shall be appointed for the
remainder of the term. No board member appointed under
sections 262.820 to 262.859 by the governor shall serve more
than two consecutive full terms. Each appointed board
member shall hold office for the term of the member's

SB 1422 3
appointment and until a successor is appointed and
qualified. [The board shall have four ex officio members,
including the president of the Missouri Grape Growers
Association, the president of the Missouri Vintners
Association, the president of the Missouri Wine Marketing
and Research Council, and the director of the department of
agriculture. Ex officio members shall be voting members of
the board and their terms will coincide with the time they
hold the elected or appointed office qualifying them to be a
member of the board.]
262.856. The board shall have all of the powers
necessary and convenient to carry out and effectuate the
purposes and provisions of sections 262.820 to 262.859,
including, but not limited to, the power to:
(1) Receive and accept from any source, aid, or
contributions of money, property, labor, or other things of
value to be held, used, and applied to carry out the
purposes of sections 262.820 to 262.859, subject to the
conditions upon which the grants or contributions are made,
including, but not limited to, gifts, or grants from any
department, agency, or instrumentality of the United States
for any purpose consistent with sections 262.820 to
262.859. All moneys collected under this subdivision shall
be deposited into the Missouri wine and grape fund,
established under section 311.554;
(2) To conduct research and work with and counsel the
viticulture [and], enology, and distillation experts on the
needs and requirements of grape producers and wine makers so
as to optimize their work in developing the best strains of
all grape varieties related to soil and climate conditions
throughout the state and developing the art of wine making
utilizing Missouri produced grapes;

SB 1422 4
(3) To review progress and final reports from these
experts to determine the potential of economic forecasts for
developing the Missouri grape and wine industries;
(4) To [confer and cooperate with similar boards or
councils in other states to further understandings and
accords on the grape and wine industries] develop
initiatives to promote the production and sale of Missouri
wine, grapes, and distilled spirits, including but not
limited to cooperative advertising and branding;
(5) To coordinate with the division of tourism to
promote beverage tourism in the state;
(6) To approve and recommend desirable amendments to
these powers of the board; and
[(6)] (7) To perform such other duties as may be
necessary to proper operations of the board.
311.554. 1. In addition to the charges imposed by
section 311.550, there shall be paid to and collected by the
director of revenue for the privilege of selling wine, an
additional charge of ten and one-half cents per gallon or
fraction thereof. The additional charge shall be paid and
collected in the same manner and at the same time that the
charges imposed by section 311.550 are paid and collected.
2. Until June 30, 2006, the revenue derived from the
additional charge imposed by subsection 1 shall be deposited
by the state treasurer to the credit of a separate account
in the marketing development fund created by section
261.035. Beginning July 1, 2006, the revenue derived from
such additional charge shall be deposited by the state
treasurer in the Missouri wine and grape fund created by
this section. Moneys to the credit of both the marketing
development fund and the Missouri wine and grape fund shall
be used only for market development in developing programs

SB 1422 5
for growing, selling, and marketing of grapes and grape
products grown in Missouri, including all necessary funding
for the employment of experts in the fields of viticulture
[and], enology, and distillation as deemed necessary, and
programs aimed at improving marketing of all varieties of
grapes grown in Missouri; and shall be appropriated and used
for no other purpose. Beginning August 28, 2026, all moneys
collected by the Missouri wine, grape, and spirits board
pursuant to section 262.856 shall be deposited into the
Missouri wine and grape fund to carry out the provisions of
this section.
3. There is hereby created in the state treasury the
"Missouri Wine and Grape Fund", which shall consist of money
collected under this section. The state treasurer shall be
custodian of the fund and shall approve disbursements from
the fund to the department of agriculture for use solely by
the Missouri wine [and], grape, and spirits board created
under section 262.820 in accordance with sections 30.170 and
30.180. Upon appropriation, money in the fund shall be used
solely for the administration of this section.
Notwithstanding the provisions of section 33.080 to the
contrary, any moneys remaining in the fund at the end of the
biennium shall not revert to the credit of the general
revenue fund. The state treasurer shall invest moneys in
the fund in the same manner as other funds are invested.
Any interest and moneys earned on such investments shall be
credited to the fund.
4. In addition to the charges imposed by subsection 1
of this section and section 311.550, there shall be paid to
and collected by the director of revenue for the privilege
of selling wine an additional charge of ten and one-half
cents per gallon or fraction thereof. Until June 30, 2006,

SB 1422 6
this additional ten and one-half cents per gallon shall be
deposited by the state treasurer to the credit of a separate
account in the marketing development fund created by section
261.035. Beginning July 1, 2006, the revenue derived from
such additional charge shall be deposited by the state
treasurer in the Missouri wine and grape fund created in
this section.
✓